Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1218.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "ready-to-drink cocktail" in section 102 of the act of April 12, 1951 (P.L.90, No.21), known <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 as the Liquor Code, added July 17, 2024 (P.L.924, No.86), is amended to read:Section 102. Definitions.--The following words or phrases, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, shall have the meanings ascribed to them in this section:* * *"Ready-to-drink cocktail" shall mean a beverage, composed in part of distilled liquor, combined with other nonalcoholic ingredients, carbonated or still, by whatever name the beverage may be called, premixed and packaged in original containers by the manufacturer, containing not more than [sixteen ounces] four hundred seventy-five milliliters that is not mixed or adulterated on the licensed premises of a licensee. The term shall include any beverage consisting of at least one-half of one per centum, but not greater than twelve and one-half per centum, alcohol by volume. The term shall not include any beverage composed, in part, of wine or malt or brewed beverages. A ready-to-drink cocktail shall be considered liquor unless the context clearly indicates otherwise.* * *Section 2. Section 408.12(a)(13) and (14) of the act are amended and the subsection is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 408.12. Wine and Spirits Auction Permits.--(a) Upon application of:* * *(13) any nonprofit organization as defined in section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (Public Law 99-514, 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3)) and that is registered with the Bureau of Corporations and Charitable Organizations of the Department of 20260SB1218PN1510 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 State, recognized as a community-based voluntary organization committed to fighting cancer and has been in existence for at least five years; [or](14) any community-based voluntary health organization in a county of the second class which enriches the lives of children and young adults with disabilities and chronic illnesses;and upon payment of a fee of thirty dollars ($30) per day, the board shall issue a wine and spirits auction permit good for a period of not more than four consecutive or nonconsecutive days per calendar year[.]; or(15) any nonprofit organization as defined under section 501(c)(3) or (6) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 that is organized for the purpose of connecting and advancing the hospitality industry through community involvement, educational programming and career development initiatives.* * *Section 3. The act is amended by adding a section to read:SECTION 1. THE ACT OF APRIL 12, 1951 (P.L.90, NO.21), KNOWN AS THE LIQUOR CODE, IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SECTION TO READ:Section 408.17. Philadelphia 250 Permits.--(a) A restaurant, hotel, retail dispenser, brewery, distillery, limited distillery or limited winery licensee that is located in a city of the first class may apply to the board for a Philadelphia 250 permit subject to the fees, limitations and privileges provided for in this section.(b) An application for a permit under this section shall:(1) be filed with the board no less than fourteen THIRTY days prior to the date on which the applicant intends to begin operating under subsection (e);(2) include an application fee of five hundred dollars 20260SB1218PN1510 - 3 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ($500), which shall be deposited by the board into The State Stores Fund; and (3) include confirmation that the licensee has completed a specialized program offered by a city of the first class to provide training for nighttime safety for patrons and employees ; AND(4) BE POSTED ON THE BOARD'S PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE, INCLUDING THE NAME AND ADDRESS OF THE LICENSED ESTABLISHMENT.(B.1) AN APPLICANT SHALL POST A NOTICE OF APPLICATION FOR A PERMIT UNDER THIS SECTION IN A CONSPICUOUS PLACE ON THE OUTSIDE OF THE PREMISES VISIBLE TO THE PUBLIC FOR WHICH THE PERMIT IS TO BE USED.(c) The board may not issue a permit under this section if:(1) A protest is filed with the board by a city of the first class to the issuance of the permit.(2) The license of an applicant is:(i) subject to a pending objection by the Director of the Bureau of Licensing or the board under section 470(a.1), until the matter is decided;(ii) suspended under section 1799.6-E of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as "The Fiscal Code";(iii) subject to a conditional licensing agreement resulting from renewal proceedings under section 470; or(iv) subject to a pending license suspension under section 471.(d) A denial of a permit by the board under subsection (c) shall not be appealable. Any disputes between the city of the first class and an applicant or other interested parties regarding protests filed under subsection (c)(1) shall be 20260SB1218PN1510 - 4 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 resolved between those parties and shall not involve the board.(e) The following shall apply to a permit granted under this section:(1) A permit granted under this section shall be valid beginning June 11, 2026, and ending July 20, 2026.(2) Subject to paragraph (3), a permit holder under this section shall be granted a two-hour extension per day on the premises to the operating privileges provided by the underlying license.(3) Sales for off-premises consumption shall be confined to the times permitted by the underlying license and shall be subject to the same rights and restrictions that are imposed on the underlying license.(f) A copy of each approved permit shall be made available to the public on the board's publicly accessible Internet website and shall be conspicuously displayed at the place of business, including a display on the front door of the premises.(g) The board may immediately revoke a permit issued under this section if the licensee holding the permit operates outside the scope of the permit as set forth in this section or otherwise abuses the privileges granted by the permit. The enforcement bureau, a city of the first class or a local law enforcement agency may make a report to the board requesting the revocation of the permit.(h) This section and permits issued under this section shall expire July 20, 2026.Section 4. Section 412(f)(2) and (j) of the act are amended to read:Section 412. Public Venue License.--* * *(f) Licenses issued under this section are to be considered 20260SB1218PN1510 - 5 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 restaurant liquor licenses. However, the following additional restrictions and privileges apply:* * *(2) Sales of alcoholic beverages before, during and after professional and amateur athletic events, performing arts events or other entertainment events may consist of liquor or malt or brewed beverages in shatterproof containers. Sales during trade shows, conventions, banquets or at other events, or sales made in the club seats or at a restaurant facility, may consist of liquor or malt or brewed beverages in any type of container; however, any liquor or malt or brewed beverages sold in the club seats or restaurant facility must remain in the club seating level or restaurant facility. For purposes of this section, a club seat is any seating located on the designated club seating level and partitioned from general seating by a wall, divider, partial wall or railing. The club seating level must not be accessible by the general public. Sales at zoos during private banquets and other events may be at any site within zoo property and may consist of any type of alcohol in any type of container. The board's records shall clearly delineate where the sale of liquor or malt or brewed beverages in any type of container may occur. Sales of alcoholic beverages before, during and after professional and amateur athletic events, performing arts events or other entertainment events and sales during trade shows, conventions, banquets or at other events, or sales made in the club seats or at a restaurant facility, may include sales of ready-to-draft pre-mixed keg cocktails. The use of ready-to-draft pre-mixed keg cocktails may only be sold and consumed on the public venue license premises.* * *20260SB1218PN1510 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (j) As used in this section, [the term "amusement park"] the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Amusement park" shall have the same meaning as defined in section 2 of the act of June 18, 1984 (P.L.384, No.81), known as the "Amusement Ride Inspection Act.""Ready-to-draft pre-mixed keg cocktail" shall mean a beverage prepared on the licensed premises of a public venue licensee, in which a nonalcoholic cocktail base, consisting of juices, syrups, bitters, carbonated or noncarbonated water or other flavorings, is combined with liquor in a sealed keg or similar container using a gas-driven system for the purpose of dispensing cocktails for on-premises consumption.Section 5 2. Section 412.1(c) of the act, added December 22, 2025 (P.L.337, No.56), is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 412.1. Special Sporting Event Permits for Public Venue Licensees.--* * *(c) [A] Except as provided for under subsection (c.1), a permit issued under this section shall be valid for a period of no more than six days associated with the special sporting event.(c.1) Notwithstanding subsection (c), a permit issued in 2026 to a public venue licensee in a city of the first class for an international soccer tournament shall be valid for a period of no more than fifty days in association with the international soccer tournament.* * *Section 6. Section 491(4) and (10) of the act are amended to 20260SB1218PN1510 - 7 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 read:Section 491. Unlawful Acts Relative to Liquor, Alcohol and Liquor Licensees.--It shall be unlawful--* * *(4) (i) Possession and Use of Decanters. [For] Except as provided for under subclause (ii), for any person to use decanters of alcoholic beverages except that the use of decanters or other similar receptacles by licensees shall be permitted in the case of wines and then only in accordance with the regulations of the board, but nothing herein contained shall prohibit the manufacture and possession of wine as provided in clause (2) of this section.(ii) Subclause (i) shall not be construed to prohibit a public venue licensee from using a sealed keg or similar container using a gas-driven dispensing system to store and dispense ready-to-draft pre-mixed keg cocktails if the use would otherwise be subject to clause (10) and all of the following apply:(A) The ready-to-draft pre-mixed keg cocktails are not maintained for more than the maximum length of time specified by the manufacturer of the sealed keg or similar container.(B) The licensee cleans the dispensing system in the manner and at the frequency approved by the board for similar dispensing systems.(C) The licensee maintains records demonstrating compliance with this clause and the lawful acquisition of alcohol stored in the sealed keg or similar container.(iii) (Reserved).* * *20260SB1218PN1510 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (10) (i) Fortifying, Adulterating or Contaminating Liquor. [For] Except as provided for under subclause (ii), for any licensee or any employe or agent of a licensee or of the board, to fortify, adulterate or contaminate any liquor, except as permitted by the regulations of the board, or to refill wholly or in part, with any liquid or substance whatsoever, any liquor bottle or other liquor container.(ii) Nothing in this clause shall preclude a public venue licensee from using a sealed keg or similar container with a gas-driven dispensing system to store and dispense ready-to-draft pre-mixed keg cocktails if all of the following apply:(A) The ready-to-draft pre-mixed keg cocktails are not maintained for more than the maximum length of time specified by the manufacturer of the sealed keg or similar container.(B) The licensee cleans the dispensing system in the manner and at the frequency approved by the board for similar dispensing systems.(C) The licensee maintains records demonstrating compliance with this clause and the lawful acquisition of alcohol stored in the sealed keg or similar container.(iii) Subclause (ii) shall not be construed to limit the authority of the enforcement bureau to cite a licensee for a violation of this clause if the licensee permits liquor or a ready-to-draft pre-mixed keg cocktail to be contaminated by fruit flies, sediment, bacteria or any other substance that would be harmful to consumers.* * *Section 7 3. Section 505.4(a) of the act is amended to read:Section 505.4. Limited Distilleries and Distilleries.--(a) (1) The board may issue a distillery of historical significance 20260SB1218PN1510 - 9 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 license to any distillery which was established prior to January 1, [1875] 1885. The holder of the license may manufacture and sell liquor produced on the licensed premises to the board, to entities licensed by the board and to the public under such conditions and regulations as the board may enforce. [Production at the distillery of historical significance shall be limited to an amount not to exceed twenty thousand (20,000) gallons per year.] The distillery does not need to establish continuous operation since January 1, [1875] 1885, in order to qualify for a license under this section.(2) The board may issue to the holder of a distillery license a distillery of historical significance license in exchange for the distillery license so long as the applicant was established prior to January 1, 1885. The board may not charge a fee for the exchange. An applicant under this subsection must surrender the applicant's distillery license for cancellation prior to the issuance of a distillery of historical significance license.(3) A holder of a distillery of historical significance license shall be permitted the same rights as governed under a distillery license.* * *Section 8 4. This act shall take effect immediately.20260SB1218PN1510 - 10 - <--1234567891011121314151617181920212223